public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dithionario_veneto-1.0.0-windows-xpi/dictionaries/vec.dic
aidar/A
dexalborar/A
inalŧar/A
traxandar/A
ansinar/A
inarđerar/A
inarpeđar/A
astiar/A
inaŧidir/A
reaver/A
badar/A
bagolar/A
xbakanar/A
xbalanŧar/A
balordir/A
rexbalŧar/A
abandonar/A
inbaoxar/A
xbarbar/A
dexbarkar/A
rebasar/A
rebàter/A
baŧilar/A
xbavar/A
bear/A
xbekotar/A
xberlumar/A
béver/A
inbiankar/A
inbiavar/A
inkonbinar/A
dexbirar/A
biskotar/A
xboar/A
sobóɉer/A
bokiđar/A
inbolsir/A
bonbar/A
dexbonigolar/A
xbordelar/A
dexboskar/A
botonar/A
dexboxemar/A
inbragesar/A
dexbranar/A
inbratar/A
inbrenar/A
brikonar/A
xbrodegar/A
xbrokar/A
xbronkolar/A
bruskar/A
bufar/A
busar/A
inbutirar/A
xbuxinar/A
scapinar/A
incavar/A
cèñer/A
tracèñer/A
recéñer/A
cicolar/A
cokar/A
dar/A
indafarar/A
indebolir/A
xdentegar/A
detar/A
dexnodar/A
díxer/A
dobar/A
dolŧir/A
donar/A
indopionar/A
indoronar/A
dreŧar/A
kondurir/A
inđalar/A
inđenerar/A
konđónxer/A
đugolar/A
èser/A
reelèđer/A
epilogar/A
estaxiar/A
exebir/A
far/A
refar/A
fadegar/A
sfaldar/A
sfalsar/A
infangar/A
desfasar/A
rinfaŧar/A
bonifegar/A
mortifegar/A
trafegar/A
fénder/A
aferir/A
inferetar/A
infestonar/A
dexinfiar/A
fiankonar/A
infibiar/A
infierir/A
defilar/A
afinar/A
sfiokar/A
fioŧinar/A
fiskaliđar/A
infiubar/A
desfodrar/A
desfojar/A
folgorar/A
straforar/A
deformar/A
formigolar/A
sforŧar/A
fradeliđar/A
frantumar/A
fraskar/A
fraturar/A
sfredir/A
frexar/A
infrisar/A
sfroxar/A
infugar/A
perfumar/A
furegar/A
fuxir/A
galar/A
dexgalonar/A
dexganbarar/A
xgarar/A
ingarbujar/A
xgarujar/A
gavasar/A
xginŧar/A
godegar/A
gondolar/A
dexgoŧar/A
graduar/A
ingranir/A
xgranfar/A
ingrapeɉar/A
agravar/A
gređar/A
gretolar/A
xgrinfar/A
dexgritolir/A
regroar/A
xgrosar/A
inguar/A
malgualivar/A
guañar/A
ingurxitar/A
exibir/A
inberir/A
reinestar/A
ingrotolir/A
inprexonar/A
insotar/A
intivar/A
inxuriar/A
iŧar/A
inɉandolir/A
xɉedolar/A
reɉetar/A
xɉoŧolar/A
inkabalar/A
skaenar/A
kajar/A
kaligar/A
kalkolar/A
kalŧar/A
kaminar/A
inkanar/A
kandidar/A
inkankrenir/A
skansar/A
skantonar/A
inkaparar/A
kapocar/A
skapuŧar/A
inkaregar/A
deskarnar/A
inkaroñar/A
karteđar/A
inkasar/A
kastigar/A
skatarar/A
kativar/A
inkaŧir/A
inkavar/A
skavalkar/A
inkaxinar/A
koar/A
kogolar/A
skokar/A
deskolar/A
komandar/A
koncar/A
konpañar/A
deskontentar/A
kòñer/A
inkoraɉir/A
inkornar/A
kostar/A
skovolar/A
kriar/A
skrostar/A
kuadriđar/A
skuèrđer/A
rekular/A
skurioxar/A
xlanegar/A
inlardar/A
xlavakiar/A
dexleguar/A
aleviar/A
xlikar/A
lisiar/A
sprolongar/A
iluminar/A
xmacar/A
malgamar/A
inmanegar/A
xmañar/A
mariđar/A
dexmaselar/A
matonar/A
remediar/A
xmalmenar/A
inxmerdar/A
konprométer/A
emigrar/A
xmisiar/A
molar/A
remontar/A
amorbidir/A
dexmorŧar/A
inmucar/A
muñegar/A
inmutriar/A
xnaturar/A
dexnetar/A
nomenar/A
xñanfar/A
odiar/A
oltrigar/A
operar/A
orinar/A
manovrar/A
apagar/A
palentar/A
inpaltanar/A
paoniđar/A
sparir/A
spartar/A
paskolar/A
inpatinar/A
inpaverar/A
apelar/A
spenelar/A
pensar/A
pèrder/A
repeskar/A
despetolar/A
piagar/A
konpiàxer/A
pilotar/A
spipolar/A
piturar/A
aplikar/A
inpolverar/A
pospóner/A
inpontir/A
popolar/A
sposesar/A
depoxitar/A
inprestar/A
procesar/A
spuleđar/A
putaniđar/A
ragar/A
ranɉar/A
raskiar/A
rekamar/A
arestar/A
riñar/A
rodolar/A
romàñer/A
inrosar/A
ruelar/A
ruviɉar/A
sakeđar/A
saltar/A
saonar/A
saxonar/A
sediar/A
konseguir/A
seɉar/A
seneɉar/A
inseñorar/A
desestar/A
siamar/A
sinkopar/A
skaɉar/A
inskarpiar/A
skermar/A
skorŧar/A
skrutinar/A
insolar/A
rasomeɉar/A
insordir/A
sparlacar/A
prosperar/A
spigar/A
resplénder/A
spuacar/A
kontrastaɉar/A
staŧar/A
destilar/A
destivar/A
destrakar/A
stríder/A
strukonar/A
destupar/A
persugar/A
resusitar/A
taɉar/A
intanar/A
tardar/A
tasteɉar/A
intelerar/A
tenkar/A
intenutar/A
apartèñer/A
mantéñer/A
terŧariolar/A
tinpanar/A
intokar/A
stonfar/A
retornar/A
tostar/A
trakar/A
intrapolar/A
tràxer/A
tridar/A
tronbar/A
intuir/A
ŧapegar/A
ŧenɉar/A
ŧèrner/A
inŧiganar/A
ŧirkuir/A
inŧukarar/A
uŧar/A
prevaler/A
soravanŧar/A
prevéder/A
invelenir/A
xventoxar/A
soveñir/A
verdeđar/A
inverniđar/A
vestir/A
dexvidar/A
viscar/A
revixionar/A
xvolaŧar/A
skonvòlxer/A
xàŧer/A
xburatar/A
rexetar/A
xmerejar/A
xufruir/A
